Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1011.16 of Title 56, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “direct primary care provider” has


the same meaning as provided in Section 4605 of Title 36 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall conduct a pilot


program to test a direct primary care model for members of the state


Medicaid program as provided in this section. The pilot program


shall:

Req. No. 2385 Page 1


1. Operate for a period of thirty-six (36) months, beginning no


later than six (6) months following the effective date of this act;


2. Serve a cohort of up to one thousand Medicaid beneficiaries;


3. Include one or more direct primary care providers, selected


based on criteria established by the Authority; and


4. Utilize per-member-per-month payments to direct primary care


providers and quality benchmarks compliant with federal regulations


to promote value-based care.


C. Contracts entered into for the pilot program established


under this section shall:


1. Be executed directly between the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority and one or more direct primary care providers, independent


of capitated contracts entered into by the Authority and contracted


entities under the Ensuring Access to Medicaid Act;


2. Specify:


a. the primary care services to be provided,


b. the target populations to be served,


c. the terms of per-member-per-month payments for direct


primary care providers, and


d. quality benchmarks to ensure accountability and


performance; and


3. Be compliant with federal regulations including 42 C.F.R.,


Part 438.



Req. No. 2385 Page 2


D. 1. The Authority shall establish a competitive bidding


process to select direct primary care providers for the pilot


program. The selection process shall account for the distinct


operational model of direct primary care, facilitating effective


integration of direct primary care into the Medicaid framework.


2. To qualify for the pilot program, a direct primary care


provider shall meet federal enrollment and quality standards as


provided in 42 C.F.R., Section 455.410 and 42 C.F.R., Part 438, with


credentialing processes tailored to accommodate the noninsurance


framework of direct primary care.


E. During the operation of and at the conclusion of the pilot


program, the Authority shall electronically submit annual reports to


the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of


Representatives, and the Governor detailing:


1. Access to primary care services;


2. Patient satisfaction;


3. Clinical outcomes;


4. Cost outcomes; and


5. Recommendations for policy changes, particularly regarding


the integration of direct primary care models into the state


Medicaid program.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2385 DC 1/12/2026 6:45:16 PM

Req. No. 2385 Page 3